Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ROUND LAKE-BREWSTER INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction of a three-story school building in Independent School District No. 2907, Round Lake-Brewster, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2023, and before September 1, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2023, and before September 1, 2026. new text end